Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.680

Appointment of nonvoting advisory members.

(1) A commodity board may appoint up to two nonvoting advisory members to the board who have expertise in marketing, operations, or other topics relevant to the work of the board. The term of office for each nonvoting advisory member must be established in each board's marketing order or agreement, but may not exceed three years. Nonvoting advisory members may serve additional consecutive terms of office if reappointed by the board.

(2) Nonvoting advisory members do not count toward establishing a quorum of the board.

(3) Nonvoting advisory members must be compensated in the same manner as board members under RCW 15.65.270(4).

[ 2013 c 40 s 1.]